de: Anzahl der Kabel des Sauerstoffsensors im Kraftfahrzeug: 1-adrig; 2-adrig; 3-adrig; 4-adrig; 5-adrig; 6-adrig; Sonstige/nicht angegeben; Sonstige
ko: 차량용 산소 센서 배선 개수: 1와이어; 2와이어; 3와이어; 4와이어; 5와이어; 6와이어; 기타/지정되지 않음; 기타
pl: Liczba przewodów czujnika tlenu w pojeździe silnikowym: 1-przewodowy; 2-przewodowy; 3-przewodowy; 4-przewodowy; 5-przewodowy; 6-przewodowy; Inne / nie określono; Inne
en: Motor vehicle oxygen sensor number of wires: 1-wire; 2-wire; 3-wire; 4-wire; 5-wire; 6-wire; Other/unspecified; Other
it: Numero di fili del sensore di ossigeno per veicoli a motore: 1 filo; 2 fili; 3 fili; 4 fili; 5 fili; 6 fili; Altro/non specificato; Altro
el: Αριθμός καλωδίων αισθητήρα οξυγόνου μηχανοκίνητου οχήματος: 1 καλώδιο; 2 καλώδια; 3 καλώδια; 4 καλώδια; 5 καλώδια; 6 καλώδια; Άλλο/μη καθορισμένο; Άλλο
ja: 自動車用酸素センサーの配線数: 1線式; 2線式; 3線式; 4線式; 5線式; 6線式; その他/指定なし; その他
sl-SI: Položaj lambda sonde motornega vozila: 1-žični; 2-žični; 3-žični; 4-žični; 5-žični; 6-žični; Drugo/neopredeljeno; Drugo
sv: Antal ledningar i lambdasensor för motorfordon: 1-tråds; 2-tråds; 3-tråds; 4-tråds; 5-tråds; 6-tråds; Övrigt/ospecificerat; Övrigt
pt-PT: número de fios do sensor de oxigénio do veículo motorizado: 1 fio; 2 fios; 3 fios; 4 fios; 5 fios; 6 fios; Outro/não especificado; Outro
fr: Nombre de fils du capteur d’oxygène du véhicule: 1 fil; 2 fils; 3 fils; 4 fils; 5 fils; 6 fils; Autre/non spécifié; Autre
pt-BR: Veículo automotor sensor de oxigênio número de fios: 1 fio; 2 fios; 3 fios; 4 fios; 5 fios; 6 fios; Outros/não especificado; Outros
fi: Moottoriajoneuvon happianturin johtojen määrä: 1-johtiminen; 2-johtiminen; 3-johtiminen; 4-johtiminen; 5-johtiminen; 6-johtiminen; Muu/määrittelemätön; Muu
nl: Motorvoertuig zuurstofsensor aantal draden: 1-draads; 2-draads; 3-draads; 4-draads; 5-draads; 6-draads; Overig/niet gespecificeerd; Overig
hu: Gépjármű oxigénérzékelőjének vezetékszáma: 1 vezetékes; 2 vezetékes; 3 vezetékes; 4 vezetékes; 5 vezetékes; 6 vezetékes; Egyéb/nincs megadva; Egyéb
ro-RO: Numărul de fire al senzorului de oxigen pentru vehicule: 1 fir; 2 fire; 3 fire; 4 fire; 5 fire; 6 fire; Altele/nespecificat; Altele
cs: Počet vodičů lambda sondy motorového vozidla: 1vodičový; 2vodičový; 3vodičový; 4vodičový; 5vodičový; 6vodičový; Jiné/nespecifikováno; Jiné
hr-HR: Broj žica senzora kisika u motornom vozilu: 1 žica; 2 žice; 3 žice; 4 žice; 5 žica; 6 žica; Ostalo/nespecificirano; Ostalo
lt-LT: Motorinės transporto priemonės deguonies jutiklio laidų skaičius: 1 laido; 2 laidų; 3 laidų; 4 laidų; 5 laidų; 6 laidų; Kita / nenurodyta; Kita
sk-SK: Počet vodičov kyslíkového senzora v motorovom vozidle: 1-vodičové; 2-vodičové; 3-vodičové; 4-vodičové; 5-vodičové; 6-vodičové; Iné/nešpecifikované; Iné
nb: Motorvognens oksygensensor – antall ledninger: 1-leder; 2-leder; 3-leder; 4-leder; 5-leder; 6-leder; Annet / ikke spesifisert; Annet
da: Antal ledninger til lambdasensor i motorkøretøj: 1 ledning; 2 ledninger; 3 ledninger; 4 ledninger; 5 ledninger; 6 ledninger; Andet/ikke angivet; Andet
es: Cantidad de cables del sensor de oxígeno del vehículo: 1 cable; 2 cables; 3 cables; 4 cables; 5 cables; 6 cables; Otro/no especificado; Otro
vi: Số lượng dây của cảm biến oxy trên xe cơ giới: 1 dây; 2 dây; 3 dây; 4 dây; 5 dây; 6 dây; Khác/Không xác định; Khác
bg-BG: Брой проводници на кислородния сензор за моторно превозно средство: С 1 проводник; С 2 проводника; С 3 проводника; С 4 проводника; С 5 проводника; С 6 проводника; Друго/неуточнено; Друго
th: เซ็นเซอร์ออกซิเจนในรถยนต์ จำนวนสายไฟ: 1 สาย; 2 สาย; 3 สาย; 4 สาย; 5 สาย; 6 สาย; อื่นๆ/ไม่ระบุ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 車用含氧感測器線數: 1 線; 2 線; 3 線; 4 線; 5 線; 6 線; 其他/未指定; 其他
ru: Количество проводов кислородного датчика автомобиля: 1-проводной; 2-проводной; 3-проводной; 4-проводной; 5-проводной; 6-проводной; Другое / не указано; Другое
zh-CN: 机动车氧传感器线束数量: 1 线; 2 线; 3 线; 4 线; 5 线; 6 线; 其他/未指定; 其他
tr: Motorlu taşıt oksijen sensörü kablo sayısı: 1 kablolu; 2 kablolu; 3 kablolu; 4 kablolu; 5 kablolu; 6 kablolu; Diğer/Belirtilmemiş; Diğer